Washington statutes.
RCW 44.48.010

Committee created—Composition.

There is hereby created a legislative evaluation and accountability program committee which shall consist of four senators and four representatives from the legislature. The senate members of the committee shall be appointed by the president of the senate and the house members of the committee shall be appointed by the speaker of the house. Not more than two members from each house shall be from the same political party. All members shall be appointed before the close of the 1977 session of the legislature and before the close of each regular session during an odd-numbered year thereafter. Members shall be subject to confirmation, as to the senate members by the senate, and as to the house members by the house.

[ 1980 c 87 s 40; 1977 ex.s. c 373 s 1.]